Wyoming, session 2026, SF0125.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1.

SF0125

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0498
(a) On and after April 15, 2027 and subject to any
other legislation providing otherwise, the Wyoming business
council shall:

(i) Not accept any new applications for grants,
loans, bonds or other funding for any programs operated by
the Wyoming business council or for any programs for which
the council has been delegated administration or operation;

(ii) Not process any pending applications for
grants, loans, financial aid, bonds or other funding for
any programs operated by the Wyoming business council or
for any programs for which the council has been delegated
administration or operation;

(iii) Not approve any grants or financial aid or
disburse any grant funds for financial aid for grants or
applications not approved or executed before the effective
date of this section. For purposes of this paragraph, the
business council may disburse grant funds and financial aid
encumbered or obligated until April 15, 2027;

SF0125

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0498
(iv) Not approve any loans or bonds or disburse
any funds for loans or bonds not approved or executed
before the effective date of this section.

(b) Not later than April 30, 2026, the Wyoming
business council shall report to the joint appropriations
committee, the joint minerals, business and economic
development interim committee, the governor, the state
budget department, the state loan and investment board and
the Wyoming energy authority on all of the following:

(i) The total amount of grant funds and
financial aid obligated for disbursement, but not
disbursed, approved or executed before the effective date
of this section, itemized by program;

(ii) The number of loans executed by the
business council before the effective date of this section
that are still outstanding as of the date of the report
required under this subsection. In reporting information
under this paragraph, the business council shall itemize
each loan by program and report the recipient of each
outstanding loan, the terms and conditions of each
SF0125

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0498
outstanding loan, the repayment schedule for each loan and
the amount remaining to be repaid for each outstanding
loan;

(iii) The number of bonds executed by the
business council before the effective date of this section
that are still outstanding as of the date of the report
required under this subsection. In reporting information
under this paragraph, the business council shall report
each outstanding bond, the terms and conditions of each
outstanding bond and any amount remaining to be paid or
repaid for each outstanding bond;

(iv) All real and personal property owned or
held by the business council as of the date of the report
required under this subsection. Information reported under
this paragraph shall include the program or function for
which the property is owned or held;

(v) Each program and function administered or
operated by the business council not otherwise specified in
this subsection;

SF0125

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0498
(vi) Each set or group of funds received by the
business council for:

(A) Funds held or invested by or for the
Wyoming business council for any programs for which the
business council has statutory authority or other delegated
authority to operate and administer, and the associated
programs and functions connected to or funded by those
funds;

(B) Funds received by the business council
from any nonstate source for disbursement or expenditure
for any purpose, program or function for which the business
council has statutory authority or other delegated
authority to operate and administer, and the associated
programs and functions connected to or funded by those
funds;

(C) Funds or accounts held or administered
by the Wyoming business council containing funds or created
within the revolving investment fund created under article
16, section 12 of the Wyoming constitution;

SF0125

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0498
(D) Any other program, function or group of
funds assigned to the business council by law not otherwise
specified in this section.

Section 2. 9-2-2604(c), 9-2-2611(m), 9-12-104 by
creating a new subsection (c), 9-12-105(a)(intro),
(b)(intro), (c)(intro) and (d)(intro), 9-12-106(a)(intro)
and (b), 9-12-109 by creating a new subsection (o),
9-12-201, 9-12-302(a), 9-12-308(b), 9-12-601(b),
9-12-801(b), 9-12-902(a), 9-12-1104(a), 9-12-1202,
9-12-1301, 9-12-1501(a), 9-20-102(b), 21-18-104 and
40-11-102(b) are amended to read:

9-2-2604. Workforce development training fund
established.

(c) Expenditures from the workforce development
training fund for purposes authorized in subsection (b) of
this section shall be approved by the director of the
department of workforce services based on procedures,
criteria and performance measures established by
regulations. Notification of expenditures approved under
paragraphs (b)(iii) and (iv) of this section and a copy of
SF0125

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0498
the training fund application shall be provided to the
Wyoming business council, subject to W.S. 9-12-104(c). The
director of the department of workforce services shall
report annually to the governor and the legislature on the
expenditures made from the training fund in the preceding
fiscal year and the results of the activities funded by the
training fund.

9-2-2611. Priority economic sector business workforce
training programs; eligibility.

(m) Subject to W.S. 9-12-104(c), the Wyoming business
council shall assist the department with review of
information provided under paragraphs (h)(i) and (ii) of
this section, as requested by the department. If the
department determines that an applicant meets the criteria
established in this section and has complied with the
applicable procedures and review processes established by
the department, the department may recommend funding for a
priority economic sector business workforce development
program and the disbursement of funds under contract to the
eligible training provider. The recipient eligible
training provider shall use funds received under the
SF0125

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0498
program in accordance with the provisions of the contract.
No funding shall be provided for any program without the
written opinion of the attorney general certifying the
legality of the transaction and all documents connected
therein. Upon recommendation of the department,
certification by the attorney general, and approval by the
governor or his designee, funding from the Wyoming
workforce development-priority economic sector partnership
subaccount may be distributed to the eligible training
provider.

9-12-104. General powers and duties of the council.

(c) For the period beginning July 1, 2026 and ending
June 30, 2027, the Wyoming business council shall not take
any action that expands any program, duty or function of
the Wyoming business council and shall not assume any new
program, duty or function until July 1, 2027, unless
otherwise required by law.

9-12-105. Economic development services.

SF0125

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0498
(a) It shall be the duty of the council to encourage,
stimulate and support the development and expansion of the
economy of the state. Subject to W.S. 9-12-104(c), the
council is charged with the following duties and
responsibilities:

(b) The council, in consultation with the coordinator
of economic diversification, shall implement the
"startup:Wyoming" program in priority economic sectors
identified in the approved twenty (20) year comprehensive
economic diversification strategy under W.S.
9-12-1402(a)(iv), subject to W.S. 9-12-104(c). The program
shall:

(c) The council shall administer a
"kickstart:Wyoming" program to provide funding to early
stage ventures of Wyoming based entrepreneurs. Funding
under this subsection shall be provided upon approval of
the council, subject to W.S. 9-12-104(c). The council
shall adopt rules for funding under this subsection in
consultation with the coordinator of economic
diversification. Funding shall be in amounts ranging from
five thousand dollars ($5,000.00) to fifty thousand dollars
SF0125

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0498
($50,000.00) and be provided under the following
conditions:

(d) The council shall administer a small business
innovation research matching program in accordance with
this subsection, subject to W.S. 9-12-104(c). The program
shall match federal funds approved for Wyoming based
companies as provided in this subsection. The program
shall be administered by the council in consultation with
the University of Wyoming research office. The following
shall apply to the program under this subsection:

9-12-106. Planning and research.

(a) Subject to W.S. 9-12-104(c), it shall also be the
duty of the council to:

(b) Subject to W.S. 9-12-104(c), the council may
establish a Wyoming market research center to conduct
regional, national and international market research for
Wyoming small businesses and potential entrepreneurs and to
conduct market feasibility studies for value added projects
across all economic sectors, including agriculture. The
SF0125

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0498
center may utilize the services of student interns from the
University of Wyoming and community colleges to provide
those students with practical marketing experience.

9-12-109. Promotion of agriculture; financing of
agriculture processing projects; revenue bonds.

(o) This section and any program or funding provided
for in this section shall be subject to W.S. 9-12-104(c).

9-12-201. Assumption of science technology and energy
authority functions.

In assuming the functions of the science energy and
technology authority, the council shall administer the
program in accordance with the provisions of this act
generally and the specific provisions of this article,
subject to W.S. 9-12-104(c).

9-12-302. Wyoming partnership challenge loan program;
creation; rulemaking; administration account.

SF0125

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0498
(a) The council shall establish and administer a
partnership challenge loan program under this article and
may contract for necessary professional services, subject
to W.S. 9-12-104(c). Loans authorized under the program
shall be limited, except as otherwise provided under W.S.
9-12-304(c) through (k), to community development
organizations and state development organizations and made
in accordance with the provisions of W.S. 9-12-304. Any
community development organization or state development
organization may submit an application to the council to
participate in the program on forms prescribed by and
subject to rules promulgated by the council.

9-12-308. Large project loan program.

(b) Subject to W.S. 9-12-104(c), funds in the large
project account within the revolving investment fund shall
be used exclusively to promote and aid economic development
of the state by providing loan guarantees or loans to
proposed or existing enterprises that will employ people
within the state, provide services in the state, use
resources in the state or otherwise add economic value to
SF0125

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0498
goods, services or resources within the state consistent
with this section.

9-12-601. Wyoming business ready community program;
purpose; creation; rulemaking.

(b) The council shall establish and administer a
Wyoming business ready community program as provided by
this article and subject to W.S. 9-12-104(c). Any city,
town, county or the Eastern Shoshone or Northern Arapaho
tribe, or the cooperative tribal governing body, may submit
an application to the council for a grant or loan under the
program on forms prescribed by and subject to rules
promulgated by the council. Grants or loans may be applied
for by a joint powers board with the approval of all
participating agencies to the joint powers agreement.
Grants and loans may be made by the council for economic or
educational development, planning or infrastructure
projects, including the purchase of land, buildings,
facilities, telecommunications infrastructure, rights of
way, airports, sewer and water projects, roads,
landscaping, recreational and convention facilities or
other infrastructure determined by the council to be
SF0125

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0498
consistent with the purposes of this article. In adopting
rules and making grants and loans under this article the
council shall require all projects to be related to
economic or educational development, planning or
infrastructure, which shall not include rehabilitation or
expansion of existing infrastructure unless the council
determines the rehabilitation or expansion is necessary to
meet the purposes of this article. Planning grants and
loans shall be limited as provided in subsection (m) of
this section. All grants or loans made under this article
shall be referred by the council to the state loan and
investment board for final approval or disapproval. The
state loan and investment board may adopt rules as
necessary to implement its duties under this article.

9-12-801. Wyoming community facilities program;
purpose; creation; administration by council; rulemaking
authority; eligible projects.

(b) The council shall administer a Wyoming community
facilities program as provided by this article, subject to
the approval of grants and loans by the state loan and
SF0125

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0498
investment board as provided by this article and subject to
W.S. 9-12-104(c).

9-12-902. Wyoming workforce housing infrastructure
program; creation; rulemaking.

(a) The council shall establish and administer a
Wyoming workforce housing infrastructure program as
provided by this article, subject to W.S. 9-12-104(c). Any
city, town, county, special improvement district or the
Eastern Shoshone or Northern Arapaho tribe, or the
cooperative tribal governing body, may submit an
application to the council for a loan under the program on
forms prescribed by and subject to rules promulgated by the
council. Loans may be applied for by a joint powers board
with the approval of all participating agencies to the
joint powers agreement. Loans may be made by the council
for workforce housing infrastructure projects and community
land trust projects. In adopting rules and making loans
under this article the council shall require all projects
to be related to workforce housing infrastructure or
community land trusts.

SF0125

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0498
9-12-1104. Duties of the council.

(a) Subject to W.S. 9-12-104(c), the council shall
establish and administer a Wyoming main street program to
coordinate state and local participation in programs
offered by the national main street center, created by the
national trust for historic preservation, to assist
municipalities in planning, managing and implementing
programs for the revitalization of business areas.

9-12-1202. Energy performance contracting.

Subject to W.S. 9-12-104(c), the council shall establish a
Wyoming energy conservation improvement program which
provides support development and implementation of energy
performance contract projects to facility owners
voluntarily participating in the program. In order to
participate in the program, facility owners and energy
services companies shall be subject to the provisions of
this article and rules adopted pursuant to this article.

9-12-1301. Short title.

SF0125

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0498
(a) This article shall be known and may be cited as
the "Wyoming small business investment credit program".

(b) This program and any other funding specified in
this article shall be subject to W.S. 9-12-104(c).

9-12-1501. Broadband development program established;
purposes; eligibility; definitions.

(a) Subject to W.S. 9-12-1504(c), a broadband funding
program is established under the Wyoming business council
to provide funds to eligible applicants in order to promote
the expansion of access to broadband service in unserved
areas of the state.

9-20-102. Wyoming mineral to value added product
program; rulemaking authority.

(b) The Wyoming business council shall establish and
administer the program under this act, subject to W.S.
9-12-104(c). Any commercial scale minerals to value added
products facility shall submit a proposal to the governor.
The governor may provide recommendations for the size and
SF0125

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0498
parameters of the proposed contract. An application to
participate in the program shall then be submitted to and
reviewed by the Wyoming business council under the process
set forth in W.S. 9-12-601 through 9-12-603. The
application shall be submitted on forms prescribed by, and
subject to rules promulgated by, the Wyoming business
council. In determining whether to recommend a contract
for approval, the Wyoming business council shall consider
if the applicant has demonstrated a business plan, balance
sheet, sufficient cash flow, commitments to sell the
finished product and other indices necessary to demonstrate
the applicant's ability to perform under the contract as
determined by rule and regulation of the Wyoming business
council.

21-18-104. Small business development centers.

The small business development centers shall be operated by
the University of Wyoming. The university shall specify the
organizational structure of the network of centers in
consultation with the Wyoming business council created by
W.S. 9-12-103. The university shall integrate the
operations of the centers with the Wyoming business
SF0125

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0498
council, subject to W.S. 9-12-104(c), to the fullest extent
permitted by federal law.

40-11-102. Application by public corporation to
establish and operate zone; designation of agency to apply
on behalf of state.

(b) Subject to W.S. 9-12-104(c), the Wyoming business
council is the public entity designated and authorized to
apply, on behalf of the state of Wyoming, for foreign trade
zone authority, sub-zone authority or port of entry
pursuant to the act of congress and regulations issued
pursuant to the act.

Section 3.

(a) There is created the Wyoming business council
legislative task force to consist of the following members:

(i) The governor or the governor's designee;

(ii) Two (2) members of the house of
representatives, appointed by the speaker of the house of
SF0125

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0498
representatives. One (1) member appointed under this
paragraph shall be designated by the speaker of the house
as cochairman of the task force;

(iii) Two (2) members of the senate, appointed
by the president of the senate. One (1) member appointed
under this paragraph shall be designated by the president
of the senate as cochairman of the task force;

(iv) One (1) member representing the mineral
industry, to be appointed by the governor;

(v) One (1) member representing the construction
industry, to be appointed by the governor;

(vi) One (1) member representing the
manufacturing industry, to be appointed by the governor;

(vii) One (1) member representing power
generation in Wyoming, to be appointed by the governor;

SF0125

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0498
(viii) One (1) member representing a local
economic development organization, to be appointed by the
governor;

(ix) One (1) member representing the retail
industry, to be appointed by the governor;

(x) One (1) member representing the tourism
industry, to be appointed by the governor;

(xi) One (1) member representing the agriculture
industry, to be appointed by the governor.

(b) The task force shall be staffed by the
legislative service office.

(c) The task force shall meet not less than three (3)
times during the work of the task force.

(d) Legislative members of the task force shall
receive salary, per diem and mileage as provided by W.S.
28-5-101. Members of the task force who are not members of
SF0125

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0498
the legislature or state employees shall receive per diem
and mileage as provided by W.S. 28-5-101.

(e) The task force shall:

(i) Complete a comprehensive evaluation and
review of the Wyoming business council, its operations and
each of its programs, duties and functions;

(ii) Solicit feedback and recommendations on
economic development initiatives that are needed or desired
in Wyoming and what role, if any, the Wyoming business
council should play in implementing those initiatives;

(iii) Review the information reported and
submitted under section 1 of this act;

(iv) Evaluate which programs, duties and
functions of the Wyoming business council should be
retained, modified, privatized, transferred or eliminated;

(v) Consider and develop recommended
improvements for the operations of the Wyoming business
SF0125

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0498
council, including how the Wyoming business council
interacts with and involves the Wyoming business community;

(vi) Consider and develop proposed legislation
to implement any recommendations or proposals developed
through the task force's work under this subsection.

(f) Not later than October 1, 2026, the task force
shall:

(i) Report its findings and recommendations for
the Wyoming business council to the governor and the joint
minerals, business and economic development interim
committee;

(ii) Forward any proposed legislation for the
2027 general session to the joint minerals, business and
economic development interim committee or to another
applicable committee.

(g) The task force may request the assistance of any
state agency or other entity in completing its work. Upon
receiving a request under this subsection, each agency or
SF0125

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0498
entity shall provide assistance to the task force as
requested.

(h) The task force created under this section shall
terminate on December 31, 2026.

Section 4.

(a) There is appropriated twenty thousand dollars
($20,000.00) from the general fund to the legislative
service office for purposes of providing salary, per diem
and mileage to the legislative members of the task force
created under section 3 of this act. This appropriation
shall be for the period beginning with the effective date
of this act and ending June 30, 2028. This appropriation
shall not be transferred or expended for any other purpose
and any unexpended, unobligated funds remaining from this
appropriation shall revert as provided by law on June 30,
2028.

(b) There is appropriated forty thousand dollars
($40,000.00) from the general fund to the office of the
governor for purposes of providing per diem and mileage to
SF0125

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0498
nonlegislative members of the task force created under
section 3 of this act. This appropriation shall be for the
period beginning with the effective date of this act and
ending June 30, 2028. This appropriation shall not be
transferred or expended for any other purpose and any
unexpended, unobligated funds remaining from this
appropriation shall revert as provided by law on June 30,
2028. It is the intent of the legislature that this
appropriation not be included in the standard budget of the
office of the governor for the immediately succeeding
fiscal biennium.

Section 5. Nothing in this act shall be construed to
impair any existing contracts, agreements or other
obligations of the Wyoming business council executed before
the effective date of this section.

SF0125

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0498
Section 6.

(a) Except as provided in subsection (b) of this
section, this act is effective immediately upon completion
of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided
by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming Constitution.

(b) Section 2 of this act is effective July 1, 2026.

(END)
SF0125